Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 4. HEALTH FACILITIES

SUBTITLE B. LICENSING OF HEALTH FACILITIES

CHAPTER 260D. POSTING OF OFFICE OF STATE LONG-TERM CARE OMBUDSMAN INFORMATION BY CERTAIN FACILITIES

Sec. 260D.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "long-term care facility" means:

(1) a nursing facility licensed under Chapter 242;

(2) an assisted living facility licensed under Chapter 247; or

(3) any other facility providing care to residents who are assisted by the state long-term care ombudsman established under Subchapter F, Chapter 101A, Human Resources Code.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 732 (H.B. 3961), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2022.

Redesignated from Health and Safety Code, Chapter 260C by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 24.001(24), eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 260D.002. POSTING OF OFFICE OF STATE LONG-TERM CARE OMBUDSMAN INFORMATION ON INTERNET WEBSITE. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), a long-term care facility shall post on the facility's Internet website information about the office of the state long-term care ombudsman established under Subchapter F, Chapter 101A, Human Resources Code, including:

(1) information regarding the office's role as an advocate for residents of long-term care facilities; and

(2) the office's statewide toll-free telephone number.

(b) A long-term care facility:

(1) may comply with this section by posting the required information on the Internet website of the facility's parent company if the facility does not maintain a unique Internet website; and

(2) is not required to comply with this section if the facility and any parent company do not maintain an Internet website.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 732 (H.B. 3961), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2022.

Redesignated from Health and Safety Code, Chapter 260C by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 24.001(24), eff. September 1, 2023.